North Dakota, session 69, SB2323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 57-51-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
57-51-15. Gross production tax allocation - Report. (Effective through June 30, 2027)
The gross production tax must be allocated monthly as follows:
1. The tax revenue collected under this chapter equal to one percent of the gross value at the
well of the oil and one-fifth of the tax on gas must be deposited with the state treasurer. The
state treasurer shall allocate the funding in the following order:
a. Eight percent of the amount available under this subsection to the North Dakota outdoor
heritage fund, but not in an amount exceeding twenty million dollars per fiscal year.
b. Four percent of the amount available under this subsection to the abandoned oil and gas
well plugging and site reclamation fund, but not in an amount exceeding seven million
five hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year and not in an amount that would bring the
balance in the fund to more than one hundred million dollars .
c. Any remaining revenues pursuant to subsection 3.
d. For purposes of this subsection, "fiscal year" means the period beginning September first
and ending August thirty-first of the following calendar year.
2. The tax revenue collected under this chapter equal to four percent of the gross value at the
well of the oil and four-fifths of the tax on gas must be deposited with the state treasurer. The
state treasurer shall allocate the funding in the following order:
a. The first five million dollars of collections received from a county each fiscal year is
allocated to the county.
b. The remaining revenue collections received from a county each fiscal year are allocated
thirty percent to the county and seventy percent as follows:
(1) Monthly amounts to the hub city funding pool to provide fifteen million four hundred
thousand dollars per fiscal year for the allocations under paragraph 2 of
subdivision a of subsection 5.
(2) Monthly amounts to the hub city school district funding pool to provide two million
one hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year for the allocations under paragraph 3
of subdivision a of subsection 5.

S. B. NO. 2323 - PAGE 2
(3) Monthly amounts to the supplemental school district funding pool to provide seventy
percent of the total amount needed for the allocations under paragraph 4 of
subdivision a of subsection 5.
(4) Any remaining revenue collections to the state for the state's allocations pursuant to
subsection 3.
c. For purposes of this subsection, "fiscal year" means the period beginning September first
and ending August thirty-first of the following calendar year.
3. After the allocations under subsections 1 and 2, the amount remaining is allocated first to
provide for deposit of thirty percent of all revenue collected under this chapter in the legacy
fund as provided in section 26 of article X of the Constitution of North Dakota and the
remainder must be allocated to the state general fund. If the amount available for a monthly
allocation under this subsection is insufficient to deposit thirty percent of all revenue collected
under this chapter in the legacy fund, the state treasurer shall transfer the amount of the
shortfall from the state general fund share of oil extraction tax collections and deposit that
amount in the legacy fund.
4. For a county that received less than five million dollars of allocations under subsection 2 in the
most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the biennium, revenues
allocated to that county must be distributed by the state treasurer as follows:
a. Forty-five percent must be distributed to the county treasurer and credited to the county
general fund.
b. Thirty-five percent must be distributed proportionally to school districts within the county
on the average daily attendance distribution basis for kindergarten through grade twelve
students residing within the county, as certified to the state treasurer by the county
superintendent of schools. However, a hub city school district must be omitted from
distributions under this subdivision.
c. Twenty percent must be distributed to the incorporated cities of the county. A hub city
must be omitted from distributions under this subdivision. Distributions among cities
under this subsection must be proportional based upon the population of each
incorporated city according to the last official decennial federal census. In determining
the population of any city in which total employment increases by more than two hundred
percent seasonally due to tourism, the population of that city for purposes of this
subdivision must be increased by eight hundred percent.
d. For purposes of this subsection, "fiscal year" means the period beginning September first
and ending August thirty-first of the following calendar year.
5. For a county that received five million dollars or more of allocations under subsection 2 in the
most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the biennium, revenues
allocated to that county must be distributed by the state treasurer as follows:
a. A portion of the revenues from each county must be distributed to a hub city funding pool,
a hub city school district funding pool, and a supplemental school district funding pool as
follows:
(1) The amount distributed from each county to the funding pools under this subdivision
must be proportional to each county's monthly oil and gas gross production tax
revenue collections relative to the combined total monthly oil and gas gross
production tax revenue collections from all the counties that receive allocations
under this subsection.

S. B. NO. 2323 - PAGE 3
(2) The state treasurer shall distribute, to the hub city funding pool, the monthly amount
needed from each county to provide six million six hundred thousand dollars per
fiscal year for the allocations under this paragraph.
(a) The state treasurer shall allocate monthly amounts from the hub city funding
pool to provide a combined total of twenty-two million dollars per fiscal year to
all the hub cities, which includes the fifteen million four hundred thousand
dollars under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of subsection 2 and the six million
six hundred thousand dollars under this paragraph. The monthly allocation to
each hub city must be proportional to each hub city's impact percentage
score, including fractional percentage points rounded to the nearest tenth of a
percent, relative to the combined total of all the hub cities' impact percentage
scores.
(b) The state treasurer shall calculate the impact percentage score for each hub
city by summing the following:
[1] The percentage of mining, quarrying, and oil and gas extraction
employment relative to the total employment of all industries in the
county in which the hub city is located, based on the most recent annual
data for all ownership types compiled by job service North Dakota in the
quarterly census of employment and wages, multiplied by forty-five
hundredths;
[2] The average of the percentage of mining, quarrying, and oil and gas
extraction employment relative to the total employment of all industries in
each county for all the counties in the human service region in which the
hub city is located, based on the most recent annual data for all
ownership types compiled by job service North Dakota in the quarterly
census of employment and wages, multiplied by fifteen hundredths;
[3] The percentage of establishments engaged in mining, quarrying, and oil
and gas extraction relative to the total establishments of all industries in
the county in which the hub city is located, based on the most recent
annual data for all ownership types complied by job service North Dakota
in the quarterly census of employment and wages, multiplied by
one-tenth;
[4] The percentage of oil production in the human service region in which
the hub city is located relative to the total oil production in all the human
service regions with hub cities, based on the most recently available
calendar year data compiled by the industrial commission in a report on
the historical barrels of oil produced by county, multiplied by one-tenth;
[5] The percentage change in population from five years prior for the hub
city, based on the most recent actual or estimated census data published
by the United States census bureau, multiplied by one-tenth; and
[6] The percentage change in population from five years prior for the county
in which the hub city is located, based on the most recent actual or
estimated census data published by the United States census bureau,
multiplied by one-tenth.
(c) For purposes of this paragraph, "human service region" means the areas
designated by the governor's executive order 1978-12 dated October 5, 1978.

S. B. NO. 2323 - PAGE 4
(3) The state treasurer shall distribute, to the hub city school district funding pool, the
monthly amount needed from each county to provide nine hundred thousand dollars
per fiscal year for the allocations under this paragraph.
(a) The state treasurer shall allocate monthly amounts from the hub city school
district funding pool to provide a combined total of three million dollars per
fiscal year to all the hub city school districts, which includes the two million
one hundred thousand dollars under paragraph 2 of subdivision b of
subsection 2 and the nine hundred thousand dollars under this paragraph.
The monthly allocation to each hub city school districts must be proportional
to each hub city school district's impact percentage score, including fractional
percentage points rounded to the nearest tenth of a percent, relative to the
combined total of all the hub cities' impact percentage scores.
(b) For the purpose of determining the impact percentage score for each hub city
school district, the state treasurer shall use the same impact percentage
score as the corresponding score calculated for each hub city in paragraph 2.
(4) The state treasurer shall distribute, to the supplemental school district funding pool,
the monthly amount needed from each county to provide for thirty percent of the
total allocations under this paragraph. To each county that received more than five
million dollars but less than thirty million dollars of total allocations under
subsection 2 in the most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the
start of the biennium, the state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount from the
supplemental school district funding pool which will be added to the distributions to
school districts under paragraph 2 of subdivision b, as follows:
(a) To each county that received more than five million dollars but not exceeding
ten million dollars of total allocations under subsection 2 in the most recently
completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the biennium, the
state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount that will provide a total
allocation of one million five hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year. The
allocation must be distributed to school districts within the county pursuant to
paragraph 2 of subdivision b.
(b) To each county that received more than ten million dollars but not exceeding
fifteen million dollars of total allocations under subsection 2 in the most
recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the
biennium, the state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount that will provide
a total allocation of one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars per fiscal
year. The allocation must be distributed to school districts within the county
pursuant to paragraph 2 of subdivision b.
(c) To each county that received more than fifteen million dollars but not
exceeding twenty million dollars of total allocations under subsection 2 in the
most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the
biennium, the state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount that will provide
a total allocation of one million dollars per fiscal year. The allocation must be
distributed to school districts within the county pursuant to paragraph 2 of
subdivision b.
(d) To each county that received more than twenty million dollars but not
exceeding twenty-five million dollars of total allocations under subsection 2 in
the most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the
biennium, the state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount that will provide
a total allocation of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars per fiscal year. The

S. B. NO. 2323 - PAGE 5
allocation must be distributed to school districts within the county pursuant to
paragraph 2 of subdivision b.
(e) To each county that received more than twenty-five million dollars but not
exceeding thirty million dollars of total allocations under subsection 2 in the
most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the
biennium, the state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount that will provide
a total allocation of five hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year. The
allocation must be distributed to school districts within the county pursuant to
paragraph 2 of subdivision b.
b. After the distributions in subdivision a, each county's remaining revenues must be
distributed as follows:
(1) Sixty percent must be distributed to the county treasurer and credited to the county
general fund.
(2) Five percent must be distributed proportionally to school districts within the county
on the average daily attendance distribution basis for kindergarten through grade
twelve students residing within the county, as certified to the state treasurer by the
county superintendent of schools. However, a hub city school district must be
omitted from distributions under this subdivision.
(3) Twenty percent must be distributed to the incorporated cities of the county. A hub
city must be omitted from distributions under this subdivision. Distributions among
cities under this subsection must be proportional based upon the population of each
incorporated city according to the last official decennial federal census. In
determining the population of any city in which total employment increases by more
than two hundred percent seasonally due to tourism, the population of that city for
purposes of this subdivision must be increased by eight hundred percent.
(4) Four percent must be allocated among the organized and unorganized townships of
the county. The state treasurer shall allocate the funds available under this
subdivision among townships in proportion to each township's road miles relative to
the total township road miles in the county. The amount allocated to unorganized
townships under this subdivision must be distributed to the county treasurer and
credited to a special fund for unorganized township roads, which the board of
county commissioners shall use for the maintenance and improvement of roads in
unorganized townships.
(5) Nine percent must be distributed among hub cities. The state treasurer shall
distribute the funds available under this subdivision in proportion to the amounts the
hub cities receive under paragraph 2 of subdivision a.
(6) Two percent must be distributed among hub city school districts. The state treasurer
shall distribute the funds available under this subdivision in proportion to the
amounts the hub city school districts receive under paragraph 3 of subdivision a.
(7) For purposes of this subsection, "fiscal year" means the period beginning
September first and ending August thirty-first of the following calendar year.
Gross production tax allocation. (Effective after June 30, 2027) The gross production tax must
be allocated monthly as follows:
1. The tax revenue collected under this chapter equal to one percent of the gross value at the
well of the oil and one-fifth of the tax on gas must be deposited with the state treasurer. The
state treasurer shall allocate the funding in the following order:

S. B. NO. 2323 - PAGE 6
a. Eight percent of the amount available under this subsection to the North Dakota outdoor
heritage fund, but not in an amount exceeding twenty million dollars per fiscal year.
b. Four percent of the amount available under this subsection to the abandoned oil and gas
well plugging and site reclamation fund, but not in an amount exceeding seven million
five hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year and not in an amount that would bring the
balance in the fund to more than fifty millionone hundred million dollars through June 30 ,
2027, or to more than fifty million dollars after June 30, 2027 .
c. Any remaining revenues pursuant to subsection 3.
d. For purposes of this subsection, "fiscal year" means the period beginning September first
and ending August thirty-first of the following calendar year.
2. The tax revenue collected under this chapter equal to four percent of the gross value at the
well of the oil and four-fifths of the tax on gas must be deposited with the state treasurer. The
state treasurer shall allocate the funding in the following order:
a. The first five million dollars of collections received from a county each fiscal year is
allocated to the county.
b. The remaining revenue collections received from a county each fiscal year are allocated
thirty percent to the county and seventy percent as follows:
(1) Monthly amounts to the hub city funding pool to provide fifteen million four hundred
thousand dollars per fiscal year for the allocations under paragraph 2 of
subdivision a of subsection 5.
(2) Monthly amounts to the hub city school district funding pool to provide two million
one hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year for the allocations under paragraph 3
of subdivision a of subsection 5.
(3) Monthly amounts to the supplemental school district funding pool to provide seventy
percent of the total amount needed for the allocations under paragraph 4 of
subdivision a of subsection 5.
(4) Monthly amounts to the hub city debt relief funding pool to provide seven million
three hundred fifty thousand dollars per fiscal year for the allocations under
paragraph 2 of subdivision a of subsection 5 .
(5) Any remaining revenue collections to the state for the state's allocations pursuant to
subsection 3.
c. For purposes of this subsection, "fiscal year" means the period beginning September first
and ending August thirty-first of the following calendar year.
3. After the allocations under subsections 1 and 2, the amount remaining is allocated first to
provide for deposit of thirty percent of all revenue collected under this chapter in the legacy
fund as provided in section 26 of article X of the Constitution of North Dakota and the
remainder must be allocated to the state general fund. If the amount available for a monthly
allocation under this subsection is insufficient to deposit thirty percent of all revenue collected
under this chapter in the legacy fund, the state treasurer shall transfer the amount of the
shortfall from the state general fund share of oil extraction tax collections and deposit that
amount in the legacy fund.
4. For a county that received less than five million dollars of allocations under subsection 2 in the
most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the biennium, revenues
allocated to that county must be distributed by the state treasurer as follows:

S. B. NO. 2323 - PAGE 7
a. Forty-five percent must be distributed to the county treasurer and credited to the county
general fund.
b. Thirty-five percent must be distributed proportionally to school districts within the county
on the average daily attendance distribution basis for kindergarten through grade twelve
students residing within the county, as certified to the state treasurer by the county
superintendent of schools. However, a hub city school district must be omitted from
distributions under this subdivision.
c. Twenty percent must be distributed to the incorporated cities of the county. A hub city
must be omitted from distributions under this subdivision. Distributions among cities
under this subsection must be proportional based upon the population of each
incorporated city according to the last official decennial federal census. In determining
the population of any city in which total employment increases by more than two hundred
percent seasonally due to tourism, the population of that city for purposes of this
subdivision must be increased by eight hundred percent.
d. For purposes of this subsection, "fiscal year" means the period beginning September first
and ending August thirty-first of the following calendar year.
5. For a county that received five million dollars or more of allocations under subsection 2 in the
most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the biennium, revenues
allocated to that county must be distributed by the state treasurer as follows:
a. A portion of the revenues from each county must be distributed to a hub city funding pool,
a hub city school district funding pool, and a supplemental school district funding pool,
and a hub city debt relief funding pool as follows:
(1) The amount distributed from each county to the funding pools under this subdivision
must be proportional to each county's monthly oil and gas gross production tax
revenue collections relative to the combined total monthly oil and gas gross
production tax revenue collections from all the counties that receive allocations
under this subsection.
(2) The state treasurer shall distribute, to the hub city funding pool, the monthly amount
needed from each county to provide six million six hundred thousand dollars per
fiscal year for the allocations under this paragraph.
(a) The state treasurer shall allocate monthly amounts from the hub city funding
pool to provide a combined total of twenty-two million dollars per fiscal year to
all the hub cities, which includes the fifteen million four hundred thousand
dollars under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of subsection 2 and the six million
six hundred thousand dollars under this paragraph. The monthly allocation to
each hub city must be proportional to each hub city's impact percentage
score, including fractional percentage points rounded to the nearest tenth of a
percent, relative to the combined total of all the hub cities' impact percentage
scores.
(b) The state treasurer shall calculate the impact percentage score for each hub
city by summing the following:
[1] The percentage of mining, quarrying, and oil and gas extraction
employment relative to the total employment of all industries in the
county in which the hub city is located, based on the most recent annual
data for all ownership types compiled by job service North Dakota in the
quarterly census of employment and wages, multiplied by forty-five
hundredths;

S. B. NO. 2323 - PAGE 8
[2] The average of the percentage of mining, quarrying, and oil and gas
extraction employment relative to the total employment of all industries in
each county for all the counties in the human service region in which the
hub city is located, based on the most recent annual data for all
ownership types compiled by job service North Dakota in the quarterly
census of employment and wages, multiplied by fifteen hundredths;
[3] The percentage of establishments engaged in mining, quarrying, and oil
and gas extraction relative to the total establishments of all industries in
the county in which the hub city is located, based on the most recent
annual data for all ownership types complied by job service North Dakota
in the quarterly census of employment and wages, multiplied by
one-tenth;
[4] The percentage of oil production in the human service region in which
the hub city is located relative to the total oil production in all the human
service regions with hub cities, based on the most recently available
calendar year data compiled by the industrial commission in a report on
the historical barrels of oil produced by county, multiplied by one-tenth;
[5] The percentage change in population from five years prior for the hub
city, based on the most recent actual or estimated census data published
by the United States census bureau, multiplied by one-tenth; and
[6] The percentage change in population from five years prior for the county
in which the hub city is located, based on the most recent actual or
estimated census data published by the United States census bureau,
multiplied by one-tenth.
(c) For purposes of this paragraph, "human service region" means the areas
designated by the governor's executive order 1978-12 dated October 5, 1978.
(3) The state treasurer shall distribute, to the hub city school district funding pool, the
monthly amount needed from each county to provide nine hundred thousand dollars
per fiscal year for the allocations under this paragraph.
(a) The state treasurer shall allocate monthly amounts from the hub city school
district funding pool to provide a combined total of three million dollars per
fiscal year to all the hub city school districts, which includes the two million
one hundred thousand dollars under paragraph 2 of subdivision b of
subsection 2 and the nine hundred thousand dollars under this paragraph.
The monthly allocation to each hub city school districts must be proportional
to each hub city school district's impact percentage score, including fractional
percentage points rounded to the nearest tenth of a percent, relative to the
combined total of all the hub cities' impact percentage scores.
(b) For the purpose of determining the impact percentage score for each hub city
school district, the state treasurer shall use the same impact percentage
score as the corresponding score calculated for each hub city in paragraph 2.
(4) The state treasurer shall distribute, to the supplemental school district funding pool,
the monthly amount needed from each county to provide for thirty percent of the
total allocations under this paragraph. To each county that received more than five
million dollars but less than thirty million dollars of total allocations under
subsection 2 in the most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the
start of the biennium, the state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount from the
supplemental school district funding pool which will be added to the distributions to
school districts under paragraph 2 of subdivision b, as follows:

S. B. NO. 2323 - PAGE 9
(a) To each county that received more than five million dollars but not exceeding
ten million dollars of total allocations under subsection 2 in the most recently
completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the biennium, the
state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount that will provide a total
allocation of one million five hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year. The
allocation must be distributed to school districts within the county pursuant to
paragraph 2 of subdivision b.
(b) To each county that received more than ten million dollars but not exceeding
fifteen million dollars of total allocations under subsection 2 in the most
recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the
biennium, the state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount that will provide
a total allocation of one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars per fiscal
year. The allocation must be distributed to school districts within the county
pursuant to paragraph 2 of subdivision b.
(c) To each county that received more than fifteen million dollars but not
exceeding twenty million dollars of total allocations under subsection 2 in the
most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the
biennium, the state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount that will provide
a total allocation of one million dollars per fiscal year. The allocation must be
distributed to school districts within the county pursuant to paragraph 2 of
subdivision b.
(d) To each county that received more than twenty million dollars but not
exceeding twenty-five million dollars of total allocations under subsection 2 in
the most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the
biennium, the state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount that will provide
a total allocation of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars per fiscal year. The
allocation must be distributed to school districts within the county pursuant to
paragraph 2 of subdivision b.
(e) To each county that received more than twenty-five million dollars but not
exceeding thirty million dollars of total allocations under subsection 2 in the
most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the
biennium, the state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount that will provide
a total allocation of five hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year. The
allocation must be distributed to school districts within the county pursuant to
paragraph 2 of subdivision b.
(5) The state treasurer shall distribute, to the hub city debt relief funding pool, the
monthly amount needed from each county to provide three million one hundred fifty
thousand dollars per fiscal year for the allocations under this paragraph. At least
once per interim, each hub city shall provide a report to the budget section
regarding the use of the funding received under this section and information on the
hub city's outstanding debt, including maturity dates, interest rates, and annual
repayment amounts.
(a) The state treasurer shall allocate monthly amounts from the hub city debt
relief funding pool to provide a combined total of ten million five hundred
thousand dollars per fiscal year to all the hub cities, which includes the seven
million three hundred fifty thousand dollars under paragraph 4 of subdivision b
of subsection 2 and the three million one hundred fifty thousand dollars under
this paragraph. The monthly allocation to hub cities under this paragraph is:
[1] Seventy and thirteen hundredths percent to Williston;

S. B. NO. 2323 - PAGE 10
[2] Nineteen and ninety-four hundredths to Dickinson; and
[3] Nine and ninety-three hundredths to Minot.
(b) A hub city shall use the funding allocated under this paragraph for debt
repayments related to debt incurred between July 1, 2012, and December 31 ,
2025, to address impacts from oil and gas development.
b. After the distributions in subdivision a, each county's remaining revenues must be
distributed as follows:
(1) Sixty percent must be distributed to the county treasurer and credited to the county
general fund.
(2) Five percent must be distributed proportionally to school districts within the county
on the average daily attendance distribution basis for kindergarten through grade
twelve students residing within the county, as certified to the state treasurer by the
county superintendent of schools. However, a hub city school district must be
omitted from distributions under this subdivision.
(3) Twenty percent must be distributed to the incorporated cities of the county. A hub
city must be omitted from distributions under this subdivision. Distributions among
cities under this subsection must be proportional based upon the population of each
incorporated city according to the last official decennial federal census. In
determining the population of any city in which total employment increases by more
than two hundred percent seasonally due to tourism, the population of that city for
purposes of this subdivision must be increased by eight hundred percent.
(4) Four percent must be allocated among the organized and unorganized townships of
the county. The state treasurer shall allocate the funds available under this
subdivision among townships in proportion to each township's road miles relative to
the total township road miles in the county. The amount allocated to unorganized
townships under this subdivision must be distributed to the county treasurer and
credited to a special fund for unorganized township roads, which the board of
county commissioners shall use for the maintenance and improvement of roads in
unorganized townships.
(5) Nine percent must be distributed among hub cities. The state treasurer shall
distribute the funds available under this subdivision in proportion to the amounts the
hub cities receive under paragraph 2 of subdivision a.
(6) Two percent must be distributed among hub city school districts. The state treasurer
shall distribute the funds available under this subdivision in proportion to the
amounts the hub city school districts receive under paragraph 3 of subdivision a.
(7) For purposes of this subsection, "fiscal year" means the period beginning
September first and ending August thirty-first of the following calendar year.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 57-51.1-07.5 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
57-51.1-07.5. State share of oil and gas taxes - Deposits.
From the revenues designated for deposit in the state general fund under chapters 57-51 and
57-51.1, the state treasurer shall deposit the revenues received each biennium in the following order:
1. The first two hundred thirty milliontwo hundred fifty million dollars into the state general fund;
2. The next two hundred fifty million dollars into the social service fund;

S. B. NO. 2323 - PAGE 11
3. The next seventy-five million dollars into the budget stabilization fund, but not in an amount
that would bring the balance in the fund to more than the limit in section 54-27.2-01;
4. The next two hundred thirty milliontwo hundred fifty million dollars into the state general fund;
5. The next ten million dollars into the lignite research fund;
6. The next twenty million dollars into the state disaster relief fund, but not in an amount that
would bring the unobligated balance in the fund to more than twenty million dollars;
7. The next four hundred millionthree hundred sixty million dollars into the strategic investment
and improvements fund;
8. The next sixty-five million dollars to the public employees retirement fund for the main system
plan;
9. The next fifty-nine million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, or the amount necessary to
provide for twice the amount of the distributions under subsection 2 of section 57-51.1-07.7,
into the funds designated for infrastructure development in non-oil-producing counties under
sections 57-51.1-07.7 and 57-51.1-07.8 with fifty percent deposited into the municipal
infrastructure fund and fifty percent deposited into the county and township infrastructure fund;
10. The next one hundred seventy million two hundred fifty thousand dollars or the amount
necessary to provide a total of two hundred thirty million dollars into the funds designated for
infrastructure development in non-oil-producing counties under sections 57-51.1-07.7 and
57-51.1-07.8 with fifty percent deposited into the municipal infrastructure fund and fifty percent
deposited into the county and township infrastructure fund;
11. The next twenty million dollars into the airport infrastructure fund; and
12. Any additional revenues into the strategic investment and improvements fund.
SECTION 3. EXEMPTION - OIL AND GAS TAX REVENUE ALLOCATIONS - NORTH DAKOTA
OUTDOOR HERITAGE FUND - OIL AND GAS RESEARCH FUND.
1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 57-51-15 relating to the allocations to the North
Dakota outdoor heritage fund, for the period beginning September 1, 2025, and ending
August 31, 2027, the state treasurer shall allocate eight percent of the oil and gas gross
production tax revenue available under subsection 1 of section 57-51-15 to the North Dakota
outdoor heritage fund, but not in an amount exceeding $7,500,000 per fiscal year.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 57-51.1-07.3 relating to the allocations to the oil and
gas research fund, for the period beginning August 1, 2025, and ending July 31, 2027, the
state treasurer shall allocate two percent of the oil and gas gross production tax and oil
extraction tax revenues, up to $17,500,000, into the oil and gas research fund before
allocating oil and gas tax revenues under sections 57-51.1-07.5, 57-51.1-07.9, and
57-51.1-07.10.
SECTION 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this Act is effective for oil and gas gross production
tax allocations by the state treasurer occurring after August 31, 2025.

S. B. NO. 2323 - PAGE 12
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2323.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 74 Nays 17 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State